Missouri, session 2026, HB3259.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.130, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as section 537.130, to read as follows:
537.130. Any person or persons forming, directing, advising, encouraging, or
2 solicitinga part of an unlawful or riotous assemblage shall be jointly and severallyliable for
3 any damage to person or property caused by the acts of such assemblage, or of any person or
4 persons unlawfully connected therewith. As used in this section, "person or persons"
5 includes organizers and sponsors of an unlawful or riotous assemblage.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.